Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201277-2715.03
Individual income tax brackets
and rates; Tax Commissioner; duties; tax tables; other taxes; tax rate.

(1) For taxable years beginning
or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2014,
the following brackets and rates are hereby established for the Nebraska individual
income tax:

Individual Income Tax Brackets and Rates

Bracket
Single
Married,
Head
of
Married,
Estates
Tax

Number
Individuals
Filing
Household
Filing
and
Rate

Jointly

Separate
Trusts

1
$0-2,399
$0-4,799
$0-4,499
$0-2,399
$0-499
2.46%

2
$2,400-
$4,800-
$4,500-
$2,400-
$500-

17,499
34,999
27,999
17,499
4,699
3.51%

3
$17,500-
$35,000-
$28,000-
$17,500-
$4,700-

26,999
53,999
39,999
26,999
15,149
5.01%

4
$27,000
$54,000
$40,000
$27,000
$15,150

and
Over
and
Over
and
Over
and
Over
and
Over
6.84%

(2) For taxable years
beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2014, the following brackets
and rates are hereby established for the Nebraska individual income tax:

Individual Income Tax Brackets and Rates

Bracket
Single
Married,
Head
of
Married,
Estates
Tax

Number
Individuals
Filing
Household
Filing
and
Rate

Jointly

Separate
Trusts

1
$0-2,999
$0-5,999
$0-5,599
$0-2,999
$0-499
2.46%

2
$3,000-
$6,000-
$5,600-
$3,000-
$500-

17,999
35,999
28,799
17,999
4,699
3.51%

3
$18,000-
$36,000-
$28,800-
$18,000-
$4,700-

28,999
57,999
42,999
28,999
15,149
5.01%

4
$29,000
$58,000
$43,000
$29,000
$15,150

and
Over
and
Over
and
Over
and
Over
and
Over
6.84%

(3) Whenever the tax brackets
or tax rates are changed by the Legislature, the Tax Commissioner shall update
the tax rate schedules to reflect the new tax brackets or tax rates and shall
publish such updated schedules.

(4) The Tax Commissioner shall prepare, from the rate
schedules, tax tables which can be used by a majority of the taxpayers to
determine their Nebraska tax liability. The design of the tax tables shall
be determined by the Tax Commissioner. The size of the tax table brackets
may change as the level of income changes. The difference in tax between two
tax table brackets shall not exceed fifteen dollars. The Tax Commissioner
may build the personal exemption credit and standard deduction amounts into
the tax tables.

(5)
For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2013,
the tax rate applied to other federal taxes included in the computation of
the Nebraska individual income tax shall be 29.6 percent.

(6) The Tax Commissioner
may require by rule and regulation that all taxpayers shall use the tax tables
if their income is less than the maximum income included in the tax tables.

Laws 2012, LB970, § 5.
July 19, 2012